Utah statutes.
34-28-12.   Violations -- Misdemeanor.

(1) Any employer who shall violate, or fail to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2)  Any employer who shall refuse to pay the wages due and payable when demanded as in this chapter provided, or who shall falsely deny the amount thereof, or that the same is due, with intent to secure for himself or any other person any discount upon such indebtedness or with intent to annoy, harass, oppress, hinder, delay or defraud the person to whom such indebtedness is due, or who hires additional employees without advising each of them of every wage claim due and unpaid and of every judgment that the employer has failed to satisfy, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

